Hawaii statutes.
§231-4 Assessing officers eligible to
appointment as collecting officers and vice versa. Appointees to offices
or positions in the department of taxation for the assessing of taxes shall be
eligible for appointment to offices or positions in the department for the
collection of taxes, and vice versa. [L 1932 2d, c 40, §6; RL 1935, §1904; RL
1945, §5106; am L 1951, c 264, §2; RL 1955, §115-6; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16;
HRS §231-4; am L 1989, c 14, §4(3)]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next